Utah, session 2026, SB17.
Section 1. Section 53B-7-901 is enacted to read:9. Transactions53B-7-901. Definitions.As used in this part, "electronic payment fee" means a fee to recover the cost of paying a charge, discount fee, or processing fee charged by a credit card company or processing agent to process an electronic payment.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53B-7-902 is enacted to read:53B-7-902. Recovery of electronic payment fee.An institution of higher education may collect an electronic payment fee on an electronic payment made by a person to the institution of higher education.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53G-7-228 is enacted to read:53G-7-228. Recovery of electronic payment fee.(1)As used in this section, "electronic payment fee" means a fee to recover the cost of paying a charge, discount fee, or processing fee charged by a credit card company or processing agent to process an electronic payment.(2)An LEA may collect an electronic payment fee on an electronic payment made by a person to the LEA.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.